Colorado statutes. TITLE 7 Corporations and Associations
PART 5
MISCELLANEOUS

7-134-501. Deposit with state treasurer.

Assets of a dissolved nonprofit corporation that should be transferred to a creditor, claimant, or member of the nonprofit corporation who cannot be found or who is not legally competent to receive them shall be reduced to cash and deposited with the state treasurer as property presumed to be abandoned under the provisions of article 13 of title 38, C.R.S.

Source:

L. 97:

Entire article added, p. 732, § 3, effective July 1, 1998.